Utah statutes.
39-6-28.   Service of charges on accused.

(1)  The trial counsel to whom charges are referred for trial shall cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges to be tried.

(2)  A person may not, against his objection, be brought to trial or be required to participate by himself or with counsel in a session called by the military judge under Section 39-6-32, in a military court case, within five days after the service of charges upon him.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

